Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-184
Units of measurement; recognition.

The customary units of measurement in use in the United States and the metric units of measurement are jointly recognized, and either one or both of these systems shall be used in commerce within the state. The definitions of basic units of measurement and the tables of measurement and equivalents as published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology are recognized and shall govern weighing and measuring devices, standards, and transactions in the state.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 7.